tr: Uyumlu kahve kapsül sistemi: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. kapsül; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso Vertuo Serisi; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disk; Diğer
zh-CN: 兼容的咖啡胶囊系统: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. 咖啡包; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K 杯; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; 其他
ru: Совместимая система кофейных капсул: Каффитали; Dolce Gusto; Стандарт E.S.E. Капсула; Система Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Другая
ro-RO: Sistem de capsule de cafea compatibile: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. capsulă; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Altele
cs: Kompatibilní systém kávových kapslí: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. pody; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Jiné
th: ระบบแคปซูลกาแฟที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; พ็อด E.S.E.; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Suderinama kavos kapsulių sistema: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. Kapsulė; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Kita
el: Συμβατό σύστημα κάψουλας καφέ: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. κάψουλα; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Άλλο
ja: 互換性のあるコーヒーカプセルシステム: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E.ポッド; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav kapsula za kavu: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. pod; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibelt system för kaffekapslar: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESO podd; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Övrigt
fi: Yhteensopiva kahvikapselijärjestelmä: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. kapseli; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-levy; Muu
vi: Hệ thống viên nén cà phê tương thích: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESE pod; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Khác
pt-BR: Sistema de cápsulas de café compatível: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; Sachê E.S.E.; Illy Iperespresso; Cápsulas Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Linha Original Nespresso; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Disco T Tassimo; Outro
pl: Kompatybilny system kapsułek do kawy: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. kapsułka; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Pozostałe
nl: Compatibel koffiecapsulesysteem: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESE capsule; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Overig
bg-BG: Съвместима система за кафе капсули: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESE капсула; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Друго
da: Kompatibelt kaffekapselsystem: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. kapsel; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Andet
hu: Kompatibilis kávékapszula-rendszer: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESE kapszula; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Egyéb
ko: 호환 커피 캡슐 시스템: 카피탈리; 돌체 구스토; E.S.E. 파드; 일리 이페레스프레소; 큐리그 K-컵; 라바짜 아 모도 미오; 네스프레소 오리지널라인; 네스프레소 버츄오라인; 센세오; 타시모 T-디스크; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem za kavne kapsule: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. pod; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Druga
de: Kompatibles Kaffeekapselsystem: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. Kapsel; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Sonstiges
fr: Système de capsules de café compatible: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. Dosette; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso Original; Nespresso Vertuo; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Autre
nb: Kompatibelt kaffekapselsystem: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ØSØ pod; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-skive; Annet
zh-TW: 相容咖啡膠囊系統: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. 膠囊; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso Original 系列; Nespresso Vertuo 系列; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; 其他
en: Compatible coffee capsule system: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. pod; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Other
pt-PT: Sistema de cápsulas de café compatível: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; Cápsula E.S.E.; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Outro
it: Sistema di capsule da caffè compatibile: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; ESE cialda; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Linea originale Nespresso; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Altro
es: Sistema de cápsulas de café compatible: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; Monodosis de café ESE; Illy Iperespresso; Cafeteras K-Cup de Keurig; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Línea Original de Nespresso; Línea Nespresso Vertuo; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Otros
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém kávových kapsúl: Caffitaly; Dolce Gusto; E.S.E. kapsula; Illy Iperespresso; Keurig K-Cup; Lavazza A Modo Mio; Nespresso OriginalLine; Nespresso VertuoLine; Senseo; Tassimo T-Disc; Iné